Maine, session 132, LD1490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §311, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Sealed ticket game. "Sealed ticket game" has the same meaning as in section
1831, subsection 14-B.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §314-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ,
§9, is further amended to read:
A. The Gambling Control Unit may also issue, to a federally recognized Indian tribe,
licenses to sell lucky seven or other similar sealed ticket game tickets in accordance
with section 324‑A.
Sec. 3. 17 MRSA §314-A, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ,
§10, is further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2385(03)

1-A. Sealed ticket game tickets. The Gambling Control Unit may also accept a
registration from a federally recognized Indian tribe licensed under this section to sell lucky
seven or other similar sealed ticket game tickets in accordance with section 324‑A. The
licensee may operate a dispenser to sell the lucky seven or other similar sealed ticket game
tickets. As used in this subsection, "dispenser" means a mechanical or electrical device or
machine that, upon the insertion of money, credit or something of value, dispenses printed
lucky seven or other similar sealed ticket game tickets. The element of chance must be
provided by the ticket itself, not by the dispenser. The Gambling Control Unit may adopt
rules to facilitate the use of dispensers. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 4. 17 MRSA §315-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ, §17,
is further amended to read:
5. Sealed ticket game tickets. A limited dual beano registration does not authorize
the registered organizations to sell sealed ticket game tickets jointly.
Sec. 5. 17 MRSA §324-A, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ,
§25, is further amended to read:
C. Lucky seven or similar sealed Sealed ticket game tickets may be sold when that
game of chance is registered with the Gambling Control Unit and when a valid license
or registration certificate is properly displayed. Notwithstanding the other provisions
of this section and section 312, lucky seven games sealed ticket games may be
conducted during the period beginning 2 hours before and ending 2 hours after a
"beano" game.
Notwithstanding any other rule, lucky seven or other similar sealed ticket game tickets
may be sold that have a sale value of $1 or less, and a person who sells or distributes
"beano" cards or materials used to play "beano" prior to the conduct of "beano" as a
volunteer, as provided in this section, is permitted to play in the "beano" game.
Sec. 6. 17 MRSA §326, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ, §27,
is further amended to read:
1-A. Payment of proceeds. An organization licensed or registered to operate beano
or bingo and Lucky 7 sealed ticket games in conjunction with beano or bingo may use the
proceeds or part of the proceeds to:
A. Pay salaries, wages or remuneration to any person directly involved in operating
beano, bingo or Lucky 7 sealed ticket games;
B. Defray the expenses or part of the expenses that further the purpose for which the
organization is formed except that proceeds may not be:
(1) Used to purchase alcohol or to defray the cost of activities where alcohol is
served; or
(2) Paid directly to organization members except as specifically allowed in this
subsection; and
C. Defray the expenses or part of the expenses of a member, auxiliary member, officer
or employee of the organization for a serious illness, injury or casualty loss if the
licensee makes an application and the application is approved by the Gambling Control
Unit.
Page 2 - 132LR2385(03)

(1) An application must be made in the form and contain the information the unit
requires.
(a) In the case of serious illness or injury, the unit may require certification by
a licensed physician setting out the facts in support of the application.
(b) In the case of a casualty loss, the unit may require statements or reports
from a law enforcement agency, rescue or other emergency services personnel
or an insurance agency to support the application.
(c) The licensing division may deny an application if it appears that the person
who would receive the proceeds has adequate means of financial support,
including, but not limited to, insurance or workers' compensation benefits.
Sec. 7. 17 MRSA §326, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ, §27, is
further amended to read:
4. Posting. An organization licensed or registered to operate beano or bingo and
Lucky 7 sealed ticket games in conjunction with beano or bingo shall post in a conspicuous
place in the room or hall where the licensed game is conducted a sign that states: the net
revenue earned from the operation of those games in dollars and cents; the amount of
charitable donations from that net revenue in dollars and cents; what percentage in dollars
and cents of the net revenue that amount represents in donations to nonprofit activities; and
what percentage of the net revenue was distributed from licensed games for the previous
calendar year and the current calendar year.
Sec. 8. 17 MRSA §329, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 353, §1, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§329. Assistance for player
1. Restroom break. A person conducting or assisting in the conduct of beano may
assist a player by playing that player's cards while the player takes a restroom break. This
subsection does not apply to the conduct of high-stakes beano.
2. Partner-assisted beano. A person playing beano may play with another person
playing beano as a partnered pair.
Sec. 9. 17 MRSA §1831, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 136, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Distributor. "Distributor" means a person, firm, corporation, association or
organization, other than an Internet raffle operator, that sells, markets or otherwise
distributes sealed tickets ticket games, gambling apparatus or any other implements of
gambling that may be used in the conduct of a game of chance.
Sec. 10. 17 MRSA §1831, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. KKKKK,
§8, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
For the purposes of this subsection, "an event the result of which is determined by chance"
includes but is not limited to a shuffle of a deck of cards, a roll of a die or dice or a random
drawing or generation of an object that may include, but is not limited to, a card, a die, a
number or simulations of any of these. A shuffle of a deck of cards, a roll of a die, a random
drawing or generation of an object or some other event the result of which is determined
by chance that is employed to determine impartially the initial order of play in a game,
Page 3 - 132LR2385(03)

contest, scheme or device does not alone make a game, contest, scheme or device a game
of chance. For the purposes of this chapter, "game of chance" includes a sealed ticket game.
For purposes of this chapter, beano, bingo and table games as defined in Title 8, section
1001, subsection 43‑A are not games of chance.
Sec. 11. 17 MRSA §1831, sub-§14-B is enacted to read:
14-B. Sealed ticket game. "Sealed ticket game" means a game consisting of tickets
or cards with preprinted symbols, numbers or other figures that are hidden by an opaque,
removable material. Each ticket or card represents a chance to win a specific single prize,
including a monetary prize, or specific set of prizes. A winning ticket or card contains a
predetermined winning configuration of symbols, numbers or other figures. "Sealed ticket
game" includes a sealed ticket game that is designed by the manufacturer to include a
jackpot prize that is carried over to a subsequent series of tickets or cards with the same
form number in the event that jackpot prize is not won. "Sealed ticket game" does not
include the lottery under Title 8, chapter 14-A or 16.
Sec. 12. 17 MRSA §1836, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 86, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Tournament. The organization licensed to conduct a tournament game under this
section shall display the rules of the tournament game and the license issued. The
maximum number of players allowed is 100 unless the tournament game is held on
premises owned by the licensee, in which case the maximum number of players allowed is
300. Winners are determined by a process of elimination. The use of currency is prohibited
as part of tournament game play. The maximum entry fee to play in the tournament game
is $100, except the organization may add to the player entry fee to defray the cost of the
license fee, as long as the total additional amount collected from all players does not exceed
$125. Only one entry fee is permitted per person. A tournament game must be completed
within 48 hours. Other games of chance on the premises are prohibited during a tournament
game, except for high‑hand competitions under subsection 7, lucky seven or similar sealed
tickets ticket games and no more than one 50/50 raffle per tournament with a prize value
up to $2,000. All prizes awarded in accordance with this subsection must be paid in cash
or by check.
Sec. 13. 17 MRSA §1838, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 487, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
A. An organization, including a fair, licensed to operate beano, bingo or lucky seven
sealed ticket games may use up to 20% of the gross revenue to compensate those who
conduct the games.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 4 - 132LR2385(03)